District of Columbia statutes.
38-1401

Registration of medical and dental colleges — Required; permit.

(a)

It shall be unlawful for any medical or dental college claiming the authority to confer, or actually conferring, the degree of doctor of medicine, or doctor of dental surgery, not incorporated by a special act of Congress, to conduct its business in the District of Columbia, unless such college shall be registered by the Mayor of the District of Columbia and granted by him a written permit to commence or continue business in said District in compliance with the requirements of this subchapter.

(b)

The permit issued pursuant to this section shall be issued as an Educational Services endorsement to a basic business license under the basic business license system as set forth in subchapter I-A of Chapter 28 of Title 47.

History

May 4, 1896, 29 Stat. 112, ch. 154, § 1
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(y), 46 DCR 3142
Oct. 28, 2003, D.C. Law 15-38, § 3(cc), 50 DCR 6913

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 31-1701.
1973 Ed., § 31-901.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 15-38, in subsec. (b), substituted “an Educational Services endorsement to a basic business license under the basic” for “a Class A Educational Services endorsement to a master business license under the master”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 3(cc) of Streamlining Regulation Emergency Act of 2003 (D.C. Act 15-145, August 11, 2003, 50 DCR 6896).

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.